Hawaii statutes.
[§329-73] Pseudoephedrine permit. (a)
Beginning January 1, 2006, any person transporting by any means more than
three packages of any product the sale of which is restricted by section 329-75
shall obtain a pseudoephedrine permit.

(b) The requirements imposed by [subsection]
(a) shall not apply to persons registered with the department under section
329-67. A pseudoephedrine permit shall be issued by the department in a form
and manner as prescribed by the department by rule. A pseudoephedrine permit
shall be valid for one year and renewable annually. [L 2005, c 193, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next